de: Vorgesehene Spielfläche: Eis; Hallenboden; Rollschuh-/Inline-Bahn; Straße/Asphalt; Synthetisches Eis; Universal; Sonstige
fr: Surface de jeu prévue: Glace; Sol de gymnase; Piste de roller/roller en ligne; Rue/asphalte; Glace synthétique; Universel; Autre
vi: Bề mặt chơi dự định: Băng; Sàn thể dục trong nhà; Sân trượt patin/patin bánh dọc; Đường phố/nhựa đường; Sân băng nhân tạo; Đa năng; Khác
zh-TW: 適用場地表面: 冰上; 室內體育館地板; 直排輪溜冰場; 街頭/柏油路; 合成冰; 通用; 其他
cs: Zamýšlená hrací plocha: Led; Vnitřní tělocvična; Kluziště pro kolečkové brusle / inline; Ulice/asfalt; Syntetický led; Univerzální; Jiné
th: พื้นผิวสนามที่ตั้งใจไว้: น้ำแข็ง; พื้นยิมในร่ม; ลานโรลเลอร์/อินไลน์สเก็ต; ถนน/พื้นยางมะตอย; น้ำแข็งสังเคราะห์; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
da: Tiltænkt spilleoverflade: Is; Indendørs halgulv; Rulleskøjtebane; Gade/asfalt; Syntetisk is; Universal; Andet
bg-BG: Предназначена игрална повърхност: Лед; Настилка за спортна зала; Пързалка за ролкови кънки/ролери; Улица/асфалт; Изкуствен лед; Универсална; Други
it: Superficie di gioco prevista: Ghiaccio; Pavimento palestra indoor; Pista a rotelle/inline; Strada/asfalto; Ghiaccio sintetico; Universale; Altro
sl-SI: Predvidena igralna površina: Led; Dvorana; Drsališče za rolanje/kotalkanje; Ulica/asfalt; Umetni led; Univerzalno; Drugo
tr: Oyun alanı olarak tasarlanan yüzey: Buz; Kapalı spor salonu zemini; Tekerlekli/inline paten pisti; Sokak/asfalt; Sentetik buz; Evrensel; Diğer
ru: Предназначенная игровая поверхность: Лед; Покрытие в спортзале; Роллердром; Улица/асфальт; Синтетический лед; Универсальное; Другое
pt-PT: Superfície de jogo pretendida: Gelo; Pavimento de pavilhão desportivo; Pista de patinagem em linha/tradicional; Rua/asfalto; Gelo sintético; Universal; Outro
ko: 경기장 지면 용도: 아이스; 실내 체육관 바닥; 롤러/인라인 스케이트장; 거리/아스팔트; 인조 얼음; 범용; 기타
lt-LT: Numatytas žaidimo paviršius: Ledas; Salės grindys; Riedučių aikštelė; Gatvė / asfaltas; Sintetinis ledas; Universali; Kita
ro-RO: Suprafața de joc prevăzută: Gheață; Podea sală de sport interioară; Pistă pentru role/patine în linie; Stradă/asfalt; Gheață sintetică; Universal; Altele
el: Προβλεπόμενη επιφάνεια παιχνιδιού: Πάγος; Δάπεδο κλειστού γυμναστηρίου; Πίστα πατινάζ roller/inline; Δρόμος/Άσφαλτος; Συνθετικός πάγος; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pt-BR: Superfície de jogo pretendida: Gelo; Piso interno de ginásio; Pista de roller/patinação inline; Rua/asfalto; Gelo sintético; Universal; Outra
sv: Avsedd spelyta: Is; Inomhusgolv (sporthall); Rullskridsko-/inlinesbana; Gata/asfalt; Syntetisk is; Universell; Annat
hr-HR: Namijenjena površina za igru: Led; Dvoranski parket; Teren za role; Ulica/asfalt; Sintetički led; Univerzalno; Ostalo
nl: Beoogd speeloppervlak: IJs; Zaalvloer; Roller-/inlineskatebaan; Straat/asfalt; Synthetisch ijs; Universeel; Overig
nb: Tiltenkt spilleflate: Is; Innendørs gymgulv; Rulleskøyte-/inlinebane; Gate/asfalt; Kunstis; Universell; Annet
zh-CN: 适用比赛场地: 冰面; 室内体育馆地板; 旱冰/轮滑场地; 街道/柏油路; 合成冰面; 通用; 其他
fi: Tarkoitettu pelialusta: Jää; Sisäliikuntasalin lattia; Rullaluistelukenttä; Katu/asfaltti; Synteettinen jää; Yleiskäyttöinen; Muu
es: Superficie de juego prevista: Hielo; Suelo de gimnasio interior; Pista de patinaje sobre ruedas/en línea; Calle/asfalto; Hielo sintético; Universal; Otra
ja: 想定されるプレー面: 氷; 屋内体育館の床; ローラー/インラインリンク; ストリート/アスファルト; 合成氷; ユニバーサル; その他
en: Intended playing surface: Ice; Indoor gym floor; Roller/inline rink; Street/asphalt; Synthetic ice; Universal; Other
sk-SK: Určená hracia plocha: Ľad; Palubovka; Plocha pre kolieskové/in-line korčule; Ulica/asfalt; Syntetický ľad; Univerzálne; Iné
hu: Tervezett játékfelület: Jég; Tornatermi padló; Görkorcsolyapálya; Utca/aszfalt; Szintetikus jég; Univerzális; Egyéb
pl: Przeznaczona powierzchnia do gry: Lód; Podłoga w hali sportowej; Tor wrotkarski/rolkarski; Ulica / asfalt; Sztuczny lód; Uniwersalne; Inna